Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6282.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Findings.
The general assembly finds and declares that:
(1) Grocery stores provide many people with their primary place of social connection and
sense of community. This activity is particularly true for the elderly;
(2) The increasing use of self-service checkouts, where the customer does not interact with
a human, contributes to social isolation and related negative health consequences;
(3) Elderly customers and customers with disabilities often lack the confidence or ability
to use self-service checkouts;
(4) Self-service checkouts increase the risk for shoplifting, credit card theft and hacking of
customers' personal information;
(5) Self-service checkouts essentially turn customers into unpaid employees and allows
grocery retailers to decrease labor costs and actual customer service;
(6) Self-service checkouts contribute to retail workers feeling devalued and adds efficiency
pressures on workers as well as encourages grocery stores to allow longer lines for check-out stands
staffed by a cashier to encourage customers to use the self-service checkout;
(7) Self-service checkouts allow grocery stores to rely more heavily on part-time
employees, positions which do not provide retail workers with a living wage or access to benefits;
(8) Many retail workers, particularly those with a part-time schedule, qualify and receive

income-based public benefits such as food stamps (currently known as Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program benefits or "SNAP"), and subsidized healthcare;
(9) Because people of color are overrepresented in cashier positions, which is the lowest
paid position in retail businesses, the increasing use of self-service checkouts has a disproportionate
negative impact on people of color.
SECTION 2. Title 6 of the General Laws entitled "COMMERCIAL LAW — GENERAL
REGULATORY PROVISIONS" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 61
GROCERY STORES
6-61-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Grocery store" means a retail store in the State of Rhode Island that earns the majority
of its gross income from the retail sale of groceries and sells primarily household foodstuffs for off-
site consumption, including the sale of fresh produce, meats, poultry, fish, deli products, dairy
products, canned foods, dry foods, beverages, baked goods or prepared foods. Other household
supplies or other products shall be secondary to the primary purpose of food sales.
(2) "Manual checkout station" provides human assistance to shoppers, scanning, bagging
and accepting payment for their purchases.
(3) "Retail sale" means the sale of groceries to a consumer for use or consumption, and not
for the purpose of resale.
(4) "Self-service checkout" means an automated process that enable shoppers to scan, bag
and pay for their purchases without human assistance.
6-61-2. Restriction on number of self-service checkouts in grocery stores.
Grocery stores shall not have more than six (6) self-service checkout stations operating at
any one time per location.
6-61-3. Minimum manual checkout.
Grocery stores with self-checkout stations shall have a minimum of one manual checkout
station per self-service checkout station.
6-61-4. Enforcement.
(a) The consumer protection unit of the department of attorney general ("CPU") shall have
primary authority to enforce the restrictions of this chapter.
(b) The CPU shall enact rules and regulations as necessary to implement this chapter. The
fine for the first and second violations shall be five hundred ($500) dollars. The fine for third and
subsequent violations shall be one thousand ($1,000) dollars.
LC002816 - Page 2 of 4

(c) Any Rhode Island resident may file a complaint with the CPU alleging a violation, free
from fear of retaliation.
(d) Any employee alleging retaliation by their employer for making a complaint alleging
violations of this chapter may bring a cause of action in Rhode Island superior court.
(e) Any Rhode Island consumer alleging a violation of this chapter may file a complaint
with the CPU. Retaliation against a consumer for complaining about a violation of this chapter shall
be an unlawful trade practice.
6-61-5. Severability.
If any part, section or provision of this chapter is found unconstitutional, illegal or invalid,
such a finding will affect only that part, section or provision of this chapter and the remaining parts,
sections or provisions shall remain in full force and effect.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002816
========
LC002816 - Page 3 of 4